Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1317
Employees;
retirement date; application for benefits; deferment of benefits; board; duties; certain required minimum distributions;
election authorized.

(1) Upon filing
an application for benefits with the board, an employee may elect to retire
after the attainment of age fifty-five or an employee may retire as a result
of disability at any age.

(2) The member shall specify in the application for benefits
the manner in which he or she wishes to receive the retirement benefit under
the options provided by the State Employees Retirement Act. Payment under
the application for benefits shall be made (a) for annuities, no sooner than
the annuity start date, and (b) for other distributions, no sooner than the
date of final account value.

(3) Payment of any benefit provided under the retirement
system may not be deferred later than April 1 of the year following the year
in which the employee has both attained at least age seventy and one-half
years and terminated his or her employment with the state.

(4) The board shall make reasonable efforts to locate the
member or the member's beneficiary and distribute benefits by the required
beginning date as specified by section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code
and the regulations issued thereunder. If the board is unable to make such
a distribution, the benefit shall be distributed pursuant to the Uniform Disposition
of Unclaimed Property Act and no amounts may be applied to increase the benefits
any member would otherwise receive under the State Employees Retirement Act.

(5) A participant
or beneficiary who would have been required to receive required minimum distributions
for 2009 but for the enactment of section 401(a)(9)(H) of the Internal Revenue
Code, and who would have satisfied that requirement by receiving distributions
that are either equal to the 2009 required minimum distributions or one or
more payments in a series of substantially equal distributions, including
the 2009 required minimum distribution, made at least annually and expected
to last for the life or life expectancy of the participant, the joint lives
or joint life expectancy of the participant and the participant's designated
beneficiary, or for a period of at least ten years, shall receive those distributions
for 2009 unless the participant or beneficiary chooses not to receive such
distributions. Participants and beneficiaries shall be given the opportunity
to elect to stop receiving the distributions described in this subsection.

Laws 1963, c. 532, § 17, p. 1673;

Laws 1967, c. 619, § 2, p. 2075;

Laws 1971, LB 360, § 1;

Laws 1973, LB 498, § 4;

Laws 1973, LB 55, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 740, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 391, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 161, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 288, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 287, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 25;

Laws 1983, LB 219, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 325, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 32;

Laws 1987, LB 296, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1076, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 624, § 38;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 27;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 39.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.